Washington statutes.
RCW 15.28.055

Terms of present members.

Present members of the state fruit commission as provided for in RCW 15.28.020 shall serve until the first day of May of the year in which their terms would ordinarily expire and until their successors are elected and qualified.

[ 1967 c 191 s 8.]